Colorado, session 2025B, SB002.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-2-107 as
follows:
25.5-2-107. State-only funding for certain entities - application
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

- rules. (1) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL REIMBURSE A PROHIBITED
ENTITY, AS DEFINED IN PUB.L . 119-21 SEC. 71113, USING ONLY STATE FUNDS
FOR SERVICES COVERED UNDER TITLE XIX OF THE FEDERAL "SOCIAL
SECURITY ACT" AND PROVIDED ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2025, EXCEPT THOSE
SERVICES COVERED PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-2-106.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF A PROHIBITED ENTITY IS
ELIGIBLE FOR REIMBURSEMENT FROM THE FEDERAL CENTERS FOR MEDICARE
AND MEDICAID SERVICES AT THE TIME THE SERVICES ARE PROVIDED.
(3) THE STATE BOARD MAY ADOPT RULES AS NECESSARY TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 25B-002

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
Pe
da.11"
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. ulie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
E.sfher van ourik Connor Randall
SECRETARY OF ACTING CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED an "Tk.tesdal il\J3k)s-k 2-(O*" 2_02.,S a•k 1O:1Scv.
(Date and Time)
Jared . Polis
GO RNO OF THE S ATE OF CO RADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 25B-002
r